District of Columbia statutes.
1-321.03

Refund of unearned fees.

Any fee or charge paid for an examination, license, certificate, or registration pursuant to any sections mentioned in § 1-321.02 shall, if not earned, be refunded upon application therefor: Provided, that application for refund is made not later than the end of the 3rd fiscal year following the fiscal year in which such fee or charge was made.

July 14, 1956, 70 Stat. 534, ch. 590, § 3

History

1981 Ed., § 1-350.
1973 Ed., § 1-256.

Prior Codifications